Massachusetts, session 194th, H3770.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the department
of highways shall immediately take by eminent domain under chapter 79 of the General Laws
that portion of Brook street as laid out in Norfolk county in the town of Norwood which
comprises the public way which traverses Willett Pond, including the fee interest in and to the
earthen dam, spillway and attendant structures known as the Willet Pond Dam, and the
permanent easement interest in and to the abutments to the extent necessary to properly complete
construction, for all purposes consistent with the emergency rehabilitation and repair of same for
the safety of the public.
SECTION 2. The department of highways shall undertake and fund all necessary and
immediate repairs required to rehabilitate Brook street and dam on behalf of the county.
of 2

SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, no permit shall
be required from any state or local agency or body in order to effectuate the necessary and
immediate repairs contemplated by this act.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding said chapter 79, no appraisal of damages shall be required
before any taking by eminent domain for the purposes of this act. Any appraisals required for the
purposes of this act shall be undertaken and funded by the department of highways.
SECTION 5. The bridge referred to and described within section 1 shall be named the
Honorable Gregory W. Sullivan Dam in honor of his distinguished service to the commonwealth
as a representative and inspector general.
SECTION 6. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2